Tennessee, session 114, SB0725.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 11-13-101(b), is amended by adding
the following language immediately preceding the last sentence in the subsection:
It is also not the intent of this chapter to circumvent a law, zoning ordinance, or binding
legal precedent related to property rights, expansion of boundaries, or land acquisitions.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 11-13-111(b), is amended by
deleting the subsection.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-211-118, is amended by deleting
the section.
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-212-120, is amended by deleting
the section.
SECTION 5. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-212-223, is amended by deleting
the section.
SECTION 6. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0725
000670
- 1 -